Maine, session 132, LD445.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 10 MRSA §9724, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2019, c. 391, §5, is further
amended to read:
1. Limitations on home rule authority. This chapter provides express limitations on
municipal home rule authority. The Maine Uniform Building and Energy Code must be
enforced in a municipality that has more than 4,000 10,000 residents. The Maine Uniform
Building and Energy Code must be enforced through inspections that comply with Title
25, section 2373.
Sec. 2. 10 MRSA §9724, sub-§1-A, as amended by PL 2019, c. 391, §6, is further
amended to read:
1-A. Municipalities up to 4,000 10,000 residents. A municipality of up to 4,000
10,000 residents is not required to enforce, but may not adopt or enforce a building code
other than the Maine Uniform Building Code, the Maine Uniform Energy Code or the
Maine Uniform Building and Energy Code.